District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-518

Nature of limited partner’s interest in partnership.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 659, Pub. L. 87-716, § 18
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856

History

1981 Ed., § 41-218.
1973 Ed., § 41-418.

Prior Codifications